Nebraska, session 109, LB757.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB757 LB757
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-2704.28, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-2704.28 (1) A lease of property from a subsidiary to the parent
company, from a parent company to a subsidiary, from one subsidiary to
another subsidiary of the same parent company, or between brother-sister
companies shall not be subject to the sales and use tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 if such property was either originally
acquired prior to June 1, 1967, or if acquired thereafter, the seller or
transferor directly or indirectly has previously paid a sales or use tax
thereon. Such lessor company shall have the same sales and use tax
liability on the purchase of property to be leased to the lessee company
as the lessee company would have paid if the lessee company had purchased
the property directly.
(2) The purchase of an aircraft for lease, including a lease from a
subsidiary to the parent company, from a parent company to a subsidiary,
from one subsidiary to another subsidiary of the same parent company, or
between brother-sister companies, shall not be subject to the sales and
use tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 if (a) the annual
amount of the gross receipts derived from leasing the aircraft, including
any amounts derived from leases to related parties, is equal to at least
seven and five-tenths percent of the net acquisition price for the
aircraft, including the value of any trade or exchange and excluding any
sales commission paid to a third party and (b) sales tax is collected and
remitted on the lease payments.
Sec. 2. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. Original section 77-2704.28, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-